Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-1526
Fraudulent placement of ballot in ballot box; penalty.

Any judge or clerk of election who puts a ballot into the ballot box, except his or her own ballot or such as may be received in the regular discharge of his or her duties as a judge or clerk, or who knowingly permits any ballot which was fraudulently placed or deposited in such ballot box by any other person to remain in the ballot box or to be counted with the legal votes cast at such election shall be guilty of a Class IV felony.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 425.